Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
19-1-126. Compliance with the federal "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978".

In each case filed pursuant to this title 19 that constitutes a child custody proceeding, as defined in the federal "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1901 et seq., and therefore to which the terms of the federal "Indian Child Welfare
Act of 1978", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1901 et seq., apply, the court and each party to the proceeding shall comply with the federal implementing regulations, and any modifications thereof, of the federal "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978",
25 U.S.C. sec. 1901 et seq., located in 25 CFR 23, which outline the minimum federal standards governing the implementation of the "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978" to ensure the statute is applied in Colorado consistent with
the act's express language, congress's intent in enacting the statute, and to promote the stability and security of Indian children, tribes, and families. In each child-custody proceeding filed pursuant to this title 19 to which
the terms of the federal "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1901 et seq., apply:

The court shall make inquiries to determine whether the child who is the subject of the proceeding is an Indian child, and, if so, shall determine the identity of the Indian child's tribe. In determining the Indian child's tribe:

The court shall ask each participant in an emergency or voluntary or involuntary child-custody proceeding whether the participant knows or has reason to know that the child is an Indian child. The inquiry is to be made at the commencement of the proceeding,
and all responses must be on the record. The court shall instruct the participants to inform the court if any participant subsequently receives information that provides reason to know the child is an Indian
child.

Any party to the proceeding shall disclose any information indicating that the child is an Indian child or provide an identification card indicating membership in a tribe to the petitioning and filing parties and the court in a timely manner. The court
shall order the party to provide the information no later than seven business days after the date of the hearing or prior to the next hearing on the matter, whichever occurs first. The information should
be filed with the court and provided to the county department of human or social services and each party no later than seven business days after the date of the hearing.

The court, upon conducting the inquiry described in subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section, has reason to know that a child is an Indian child if:

Any participant in the child-custody proceeding, officer of the court involved in the child-custody proceeding, Indian tribe, Indian organization, or agency informs the court that the child is an Indian child;

Any participant in the child-custody proceeding, officer of the court involved in the child-custody proceeding, Indian tribe, Indian organization, or agency informs the court that it has discovered information indicating that the child is an Indian child;

The child who is the subject of the child-custody proceeding gives the court reason to know he or she is an Indian child;

The court is informed that the domicile or residence of the child, the child's parent, or the child's Indian custodian is on a reservation or in an Alaska native village;

The court is informed that the child is or has been a ward of a tribal court, as defined in 25 U.S.C. sec. 1903; or

The court is informed that the child or the child's parent possesses an identification card indicating membership in an Indian tribe.

If the court knows or has reason to know, as defined in subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section, that the child who is the subject of the proceeding is an Indian child, the petitioning or filing party shall send notice by registered or certified mail, return
receipt requested, to the parent or parents, the Indian custodian or Indian custodians of the child and to the tribal agent of the Indian child's tribe as designated in 25 CFR 23, or, if there is no designated tribal agent,
the petitioning or filing party shall contact the tribe to be directed to the appropriate office or individual. In providing notice, the court and each party shall comply with 25 CFR 23.111.

The petitioning or filing party shall disclose in the complaint, petition, or other commencing pleading filed with the court that the child who is the subject of the proceeding is an Indian child and the identity of the Indian child's tribe or what efforts
the petitioning or filing party has made in determining whether the child is an Indian child. If the child who is the subject of the proceeding is determined to be an Indian child, the petitioning or filing party shall
further identify what reasonable efforts have been made to send notice to the persons identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The postal receipts indicating that notice was properly sent by the petitioning or filing
party to the parent or Indian custodian of the Indian child and to the Indian child's tribe must be attached to the complaint, petition, or other commencing pleading filed with the court; except that, if notification has
not been perfected at the time the initial complaint, petition, or other commencing pleading is filed with the court or if the postal receipts have not been received back from the post office, the petitioning or filing
party shall file the postal receipts with the court. Any responses sent by the tribal agents to the petitioning or filing party, the county department of human or social services, or the court must be distributed to the
parties and deposited with the court.

If there is reason to know the child is an Indian child but the court does not have sufficient evidence to determine that the child is or is not an Indian child, the court shall:

Confirm, by way of a report, declaration, or testimony included in the record, that the petitioning or filing party used due diligence to identify and work with all of the tribes of which there is reason to know the child may be a member, or eligible
for membership, to verify whether the child is in fact a member, or a biological parent is a member and the child is eligible for membership; and

Treat the child as an Indian child, unless and until it is determined on the record that the child does not meet the definition of an Indian child.

If the court receives information that the child may have Indian heritage but does not have sufficient information to determine that there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section, the court
shall direct the petitioning or filing party to exercise due diligence in gathering additional information that would assist the court in determining whether there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child. The court
shall direct the petitioning or filing party to make a record of the effort taken to determine whether or not there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child.

If the court finds that the child is an Indian child, the court shall ensure compliance with the requirements of the federal "Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978", 25 U.S.C. sec. 1901 et seq.

Source:

L. 2002:
Entire section added, p. 784, § 3, effective May 30.

L. 2018:
(3) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 410, § 33, effective August 8.

L. 2019:
Entire section amended, (HB 19-1232), ch. 305, p. 2791, § 2, effective May 28.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session
Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1232, see section 1 of chapter 305, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

19-1-127. Responsibility for placement and care.

"Responsibility for placement and care", for purposes of compliance with federal requirements pursuant to the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 672 (a)(2), means the specified entity is considered to have the responsibility for placement and
care of a child if:

A county department of human or social services has entered into a voluntary placement agreement with the parent or guardian of the child;

A court, as a result of a petition for review of need of placement, has determined that a county department of human or social services shall have continuing placement and care responsibility of the child who entered care pursuant to a voluntary placement;

A court has awarded legal custody of the child to a county department of human or social services, or has committed the child to the custody of the state department of human services; or

An agency, such as a tribal agency, with which the state department of human services has a contract pursuant to the federal "Social Security Act", has placement and care responsibility of the child pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement or a court
order awarding custody of the child to the agency.

Source:

L. 2006:
Entire section added, p. 507, § 2, effective April 18.

L. 2018:
Entire section amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 410, § 34, effective August 8.

L. 2022:
IP(1) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2971, § 34, effective August 10.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-1-128. Foster care sibling visits - rules. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:
Entire section added, p. 1, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2019:
Entire section repealed, (HB 19-1288), ch. 216, p. 2238, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:
This section was relocated to § 19-7-204 in 2019.

19-1-129. Department - research authorized - prenatal substance exposure - newborn and family outcomes - report.

The state department of human services may conduct research as related to the definition of "abuse" in section 19-1-103 concerning the incidence of prenatal substance exposure and related newborn and family health and human services outcomes as the result
of a mother's lawful and unlawful intake of controlled substances.

Beginning in January 2021 and every two years thereafter, the state department of human services shall report the outcomes of any research conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the joint health committees of the general assembly as part
of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203.

Source:

L. 2019:
Entire section added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2603, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 2020:
Entire section amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1048, § 35, effective June 30.

19-1-130. Access to services related to out-of-home placement - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Gender expression" means a person's way of reflecting and expressing their gender to the outside world, typically demonstrated through appearance, dress, and behavior.

"Gender identity" means a person's innate sense of the person's own gender, which may or may not correspond with the person's sex as assigned at birth.

"Placement-related service" means any program, benefit, or service related to out-of-home placement, including adoption, kinship care, foster care homes, and private child placement, or a benefit or service described in title 26 that is related to out-of-home
placement, provided by the state department of human services, a county department of human or social services, a child placement agency, or any other such entity, or a contractor or subcontractor that provides such program,
benefit, or service on behalf of the state department of human services, a county department of human or social services, a child placement agency, or any other such entity. Placement-related services may include, but are
not limited to, pursuing adoption or any other child placement; providing early intervention services, out-of-home placement prevention services, or family preservation services; or any service related to licensing or training
for child care centers, adoptive or foster parents, or kinship care. The state department of human services, a county department of human or social services, a child placement agency, or any other such entity is not required
to contract with or access a placement-related service outside the current placement-related services that are utilized by that specific entity.

"Service provider" means the state department of human services, a county department of human or social services, or a child placement agency. "Service provider" includes a contractor or subcontractor that provides placement-related services on a service
provider's behalf.

A service provider that receives state money to provide placement-related services shall provide to each individual, family, or other service provider requesting services, including a service provider under investigation by the state department of human
services or its designee for a violation of this section, fair and equal access to all available placement-related services offered by the service provider. Service providers that provide specialized placement-related services
to specific populations are not required to provide services outside the scope of their specialized service or their specific population if the specialization serves a specific treatment-related purpose.

In addition to any restrictions set forth in section 24-34-805 (2)(b), a service provider that receives state money to provide placement-related services shall not:

Deny any person the opportunity to become an adoptive or a foster parent solely on the basis of a real or perceived disability, race, creed, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, national origin,
ancestry, or any communicable disease, including HIV, of the person or a member of the person's household. Any denial to care for a specific child or youth that includes one of these factors as the basis for the denial
must be documented, must have a clear nexus to the ability to meet the needs of the child or youth, and the denial to care must not be detrimental to the health or welfare of the child or youth.

Delay or deny the placement of a child or youth for adoption or into foster care on the basis of a real or perceived disability, race, creed, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, ancestry, or any
communicable disease, including HIV, of the child or youth, unless the delay or denial of the placement is not detrimental to the health or welfare of the child or youth;

Require different or additional screenings, processes, or procedures for adoptive or foster placement decisions solely on the basis of the following, unless such screenings, processes, or procedures are necessary to determine if the placement is detrimental
to the health or welfare of the child or youth:

A real or perceived disability, race, creed, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, national origin, ancestry, or any communicable disease, including HIV, of the prospective adoptive or foster parent;
or

A real or perceived disability, race, creed, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, ancestry, or any communicable disease, including HIV, of the child or youth involved; or

Subject a child or youth in foster care or an individual, family, or other service provider to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived disability, race, creed, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender
expression, marital status, national origin, ancestry, or any communicable disease, including HIV, when providing any placement-related service.

A service provider shall provide placement-related services in a manner that is culturally responsive to the complex social identity of the individual receiving such services. Complex social identities include but are not limited to race, ethnicity, nationality,
age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, socioeconomic status, physical or cognitive ability, language, beliefs, values, behavior patterns, and customs. Nothing in this subsection (4)
may be used to cause the delay or denial of an out-of-home placement of a child or youth, unless the delay or denial of the placement is not detrimental to the health or welfare of the child or youth.

The state department of human services shall determine whether placement-related services are provided in a manner that is culturally responsive to the complex social identity of the individual receiving such services.

Nothing in this section diminishes the protections afforded to a parent, prospective parent, child, or youth with a disability, as described in sections 19-3-208, 19-5-100.2, and 24-34-805.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire section added, (HB 21-1072), ch. 43, p. 182, § 1, effective April 19.